Hawaii statutes.
§460J-19 Termite control contracts and
written inspection reports; form and contents; filing and delivery; control
service; control service contract. (a) This section shall apply to
contracts for the control of termites and written inspection reports.

(b) No licensee shall commence work on a
contract for the control of termites until an inspection has been made and a
written inspection report and a written estimate have been approved by the
person requesting the work; provided that no written inspection report shall be
required in the event that a live infestation exists. The written inspection
report shall be on a PC-9 form prescribed by the board and shall include the
following:

(1) The date of the inspection and the name of the
person making the inspection;

(2) The name and address of the person or firm
ordering the report;

(3) The name and address of any person who is a party
in interest to whom the licensee is to send certified copies of inspection
reports and completion notices;

(4) The address or location of the property;

(5) A general description of the building or premises
inspected; and

(6) The location of visible termite infestations
apparent to the licensee.

The licensee shall not be responsible for an
infestation unless its presence was visible at the time of the inspection.
There shall be no guarantees or warranties on the written inspection report.

(c) Control service is defined as the regular
reinspection of a property after a written inspection report has been made in
compliance with this section and such corrections as have been agreed upon have
been completed. Under a control service agreement, a licensee shall refer to
the original written inspection report and contract in such manner as to
identify them clearly, and the original written inspection report shall be
assumed to be a true report of conditions as originally issued, except it may
be modified after a control service inspection. A licensee is not required to
issue a report as outlined in paragraphs (1) to (6) after each control service
inspection. If after control service inspection, no modification of the
original written inspection report is made in writing, then it will be assumed
that conditions are as originally reported. A control service contract shall
identify the particular types of termites and the portions of the buildings or
structures covered by the contract. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1987, c 102, §1; am L 1991, c 116, §1; am L 1993, c 74, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next